District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Boards and Commissions Financial Reporting
Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) There exists an immediate need to further clarify the applicability date for
expanded financial reporting requirements for certain boards and commissions under Section
5710 of Title 3 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.
(b) The Board of Ethics and Government Accountability (BEGA) identified
approximately 45 boards and commissions as containing members that BEGA considered
appropriate to file annual financial disclosures. BEGA took this action pursuant to D.C. Official
Code 1-1161.01(47)(I), adopting a rulemaking at 3 DCMR § 5710.1.
(c) In May 2025, the Council took action to delay the implementation of these expanded
financial reporting requirements until the Council could take an opportunity to consider the issue

more fully. In July 2025, Chairman Mendelson introduced permanent legislation on the issue that
is currently under Council review.
(e) The temporary act that contains the provisions delaying implementation of these
expanding reporting requirements will expire on April 3, 2026.
(f) This emergency is necessary to align the applicability date contained in the temporary
act (January 1, 2026) with the expiration of the temporary act itself and provide sufficient time
for the Council to consider Bill 26-343, the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability
Authority Clarification Amendment Act of 2025 -- the permanent legislation on the issue that is
already under Council review.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia finds that the circumstances in section 2
constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the District of Columbia Boards
and Commissions Financial Reporting Emergency Amendment Act of 2025 be adopted after a
single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.